Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Certificate of Need Program
31-6-45.2.
Participation as Medicaid provider requirement; termination by health care facility of participation as provider of medical assistance; monetary penalty.

The department may require that any applicant for a certificate of need agree to participate as a provider of medical assistance for Medicaid purposes pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49.

Any proposed or existing health care facility which obtains a certificate of need on or after April 6, 1992, based in part upon assurances that it will participate as a provider of medical assistance, as defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 49-4-141, and which terminates its participation as a provider of medical assistance or violates any conditions imposed by the department relating to such participation, shall be subject to a monetary penalty in the amount of the difference between the Medicaid covered services which the facility agreed to provide in its certificate of need application and the amount actually provided and may be subject to revocation of its certificate of need by the department pursuant to Code Section 31-6-45; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply if:

The proposed or existing health care facility’s certificate of need application was approved by the Health Planning Agency prior to April 6, 1992, and the Health Planning Agency’s approval of such application was under appeal on or after April 6, 1992, and the Health Planning Agency’s approval of such application is ultimately affirmed;

Such facility’s participation as a provider of medical assistance is terminated by the state or federal government; or

Such facility establishes good cause for terminating its participation as a provider of medical assistance. For purposes of this Code section, “good cause” shall mean:

Changes in the adequacy of medical assistance payments, as defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 49-4-141, provided that at least 10 percent of the facility’s utilization during the preceding 12 month period was attributable to services to recipients of medical assistance, as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 49-4-141. Medical assistance payments to a facility shall be presumed adequate unless the revenues received by the facility from all sources are less than the total costs set forth in the cost report for the preceding full 12 month period filed by such facility pursuant to the state plan as defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 49-4-141 which are allowed under the state plan for purposes of determining such facility’s reimbursement rate for medical assistance and the aggregate amount of such facility’s medical assistance payments (including any amounts received by the facility from recipients of medical assistance) during the preceding full 12 month cost reporting period is less than 85 percent of such facility’s Medicaid costs for such period. Medicaid costs shall be determined by multiplying the allowable costs set forth in the cost report, less any audit adjustments, by the percentage of the facility’s utilization during the cost reporting period which was attributable to recipients of medical assistance;

Changes in the overall ability of the facility to cover its costs if such changes are of such a degree as to seriously threaten the continued viability of the facility; or

Changes in the state plan, statutes, or rules and regulations governing providers of medical assistance which impose substantial new obligations upon the facility which are not reimbursed by Medicaid and which adversely affect the financial viability of the facility in a substantial manner.

A facility seeking to terminate its enrollment as a provider of medical assistance shall submit a written request to the department documenting good cause for termination. The department shall grant or deny the facility’s request within 30 days. If the department denies the facility’s request, the facility shall be entitled to a hearing conducted in the same manner as an evidentiary hearing conducted by the department pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 49-4-153 within 30 days of the department’s decision.

The imposition of the monetary penalty provided in this Code section shall commence upon the date that said facility has terminated its participation as a provider of medical assistance, as determined by the commissioner. The monetary penalty shall be levied and collected by the department on an annual basis for every year in which the facility fails to participate as a provider of medical assistance. Penalties authorized under this Code section shall be subject to the same notices and hearings as provided for levy of fines under Code Section 31-6-45.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-45.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1068, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, §§ 22, 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “April 6, 1992” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in the introductory language of subsection (a) (now subsection (b)) and in paragraph (a)(1) (now paragraph (b)(1)), and “government” was substituted for “governments” in paragraph (a)(2) (now paragraph (b)(2)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “Health Planning Agency” was substituted for “department” and “Health Planning Agency’s” was substituted for “department’s” in paragraph (a)(1) (now paragraph (b)(1)) and “commissioner” was substituted for “executive director” in the first sentence of subsection (c) (now subsection (d)).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 enactment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 265 (1992).

31-6-46.
Annual report by department.

The department shall prepare and submit an annual report to the board and to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Health and Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives about its operations and decisions for the preceding 12 month period, not later than 30 days prior to each convening of the General Assembly in regular session. Either committee may request any additional reports or information, including decisions, from the department at any time, including a period in which the General Assembly is not in regular session. The annual report shall include information and updates relating to the state health plan and the certificate of need program and an annual analysis of proactive and prospective approaches to need methodologies and access to health care services. The annual report shall include information for Georgia’s congressional delegation which highlights issues regarding federal laws and regulations influencing Medicaid and medicare, insurance and related tax laws, and long-term health care.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2005, p. 48, § 2/HB 309; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

31-6-47.
Exemptions from chapter.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, this chapter shall not apply to:

Infirmaries operated by educational institutions for the sole and exclusive benefit of students, faculty members, officers, or employees thereof;

Infirmaries or facilities operated by businesses for the sole and exclusive benefit of officers or employees thereof, provided that such infirmaries or facilities make no provision for overnight stay by persons receiving their services;

Institutions operated exclusively by the federal government or by any of its agencies;

Offices of private physicians or dentists whether for individual or group practice, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) or (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-6-40;

Religious, nonmedical health care institutions as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 1395x(ss)(1), listed and certified by a national accrediting organization;

Site acquisitions for health care facilities or preparation or development costs for such sites prior to the decision to file a certificate of need application;

Expenditures related to adequate preparation and development of an application for a certificate of need;

The commitment of funds conditioned upon the obtaining of a certificate of need;

Expenditures for the restructuring or acquisition of existing health care facilities by stock or asset purchase, merger, consolidation, or other lawful means;

(9.1)

The purchase of a closing hospital or of a hospital that has been closed for no more than 12 months by a hospital in a contiguous county to repurpose the facility as a micro-hospital;

Expenditures of less than $870,000.00 for any minor or major repair or replacement of equipment by a health care facility that is not owned by a group practice of physicians or a hospital and that provides diagnostic imaging services if such facility received a letter of nonreviewability from the department prior to July 1, 2008. This paragraph shall not apply to such facilities in rural counties;

(10.1)

Except as provided in paragraph (10) of this subsection, expenditures for the minor or major repair of a health care facility or a facility that is exempt from the requirements of this chapter, parts thereof or services provided or equipment used therein; or the replacement of equipment, including but not limited to CT scanners, magnetic resonance imaging, positron emission tomography (PET), and positron emission tomography/computed tomography previously approved for a certificate of need;

Capital expenditures otherwise covered by this chapter required solely to eliminate or prevent safety hazards as defined by federal, state, or local fire, building, environmental, occupational health, or life safety codes or regulations, to comply with licensing requirements of the department, or to comply with accreditation standards of a nationally recognized health care accreditation body;

Cost overruns whose percentage of the cost of a project is equal to or less than the cumulative annual rate of increase in the composite construction index, published by the United States Bureau of the Census of the Department of Commerce, calculated from the date of approval of the project;

Transfers from one health care facility to another such facility of major medical equipment previously approved under or exempted from certificate of need review, except where such transfer results in the institution of a new clinical health service for which a certificate of need is required in the facility acquiring such equipment, provided that such transfers are recorded at net book value of the medical equipment as recorded on the books of the transferring facility;

New institutional health services provided by or on behalf of health maintenance organizations or related health care facilities in circumstances defined by the department pursuant to federal law;

Increases in the bed capacity of a hospital up to ten beds or 10 percent of capacity, whichever is greater, in any consecutive two-year period, in a hospital that has maintained an overall occupancy rate greater than 75 percent for the previous 12 month period;

Expenditures for nonclinical projects, including parking lots, parking decks, and other parking facilities; computer systems, software, and other information technology; medical office buildings; administrative office space; conference rooms; education facilities; lobbies; common spaces; clinical staff lounges and sleep areas; waiting rooms; bathrooms; cafeterias; hallways; engineering facilities; mechanical systems; roofs; grounds; signage; family meeting or lounge areas; other nonclinical physical plant renovations or upgrades that do not result in new or expanded clinical health services, and state mental health facilities;

Life plan communities, provided that the skilled nursing component of the facility is for the exclusive use of residents of the life plan community and that a written exemption is obtained from the department; provided, however, that new sheltered nursing home beds may be used on a limited basis by persons who are not residents of the life plan community for a period up to five years after the date of issuance of the initial nursing home license, but such beds shall not be eligible for Medicaid reimbursement. For the first year, the life plan community sheltered nursing facility may utilize not more than 50 percent of its licensed beds for patients who are not residents of the life plan community. In the second year of operation, the life plan community shall allow not more than 40 percent of its licensed beds for new patients who are not residents of the life plan community. In the third year of operation, the life plan community shall allow not more than 30 percent of its licensed beds for new patients who are not residents of the life plan community. In the fourth year of operation, the life plan community shall allow not more than 20 percent of its licensed beds for new patients who are not residents of the life plan community. In the fifth year of operation, the life plan community shall allow not more than 10 percent of its licensed beds for new patients who are not residents of the life plan community. At no time during the first five years shall the life plan community sheltered nursing facility occupy more than 50 percent of its licensed beds with patients who are not residents under contract with the life plan community. At the end of the five-year period, the life plan community sheltered nursing facility shall be utilized exclusively by residents of the life plan community, and at no time shall a resident of a life plan community be denied access to the sheltered nursing facility. At no time shall any existing patient be forced to leave the life plan community to comply with this paragraph. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations regarding the use and definition of “sheltered nursing facility” in a manner consistent with this Code section. Agreements to provide continuing care include agreements to provide care for any duration, including agreements that are terminable by either party;

Any single specialty ambulatory surgical center that:

Has capital expenditures associated with the construction, development, or other establishment of the clinical health service which do not exceed $2.5 million; or

Is the only single specialty ambulatory surgical center in the county owned by the group practice and has two or fewer operating rooms; provided, however, that a center exempt pursuant to this division shall be required to obtain a certificate of need in order to add any additional operating rooms;

Has a hospital affiliation agreement with a hospital within a reasonable distance from the facility or the medical staff at the center has admitting privileges or other acceptable documented arrangements with such hospital to ensure the necessary backup for the center for medical complications. The center shall have the capability to transfer a patient immediately to a hospital within a reasonable distance from the facility with adequate emergency room services. Hospitals shall not unreasonably deny a transfer agreement or affiliation agreement to the center;

Provides care to Medicaid beneficiaries and, if the facility provides medical care and treatment to children, to PeachCare for Kids beneficiaries and provides uncompensated indigent and charity care in an amount equal to or greater than 2 percent of its adjusted gross revenue; or

If the center is not a participant in Medicaid or the PeachCare for Kids Program, provides uncompensated care to Medicaid beneficiaries and, if the facility provides medical care and treatment to children, to PeachCare for Kids beneficiaries, uncompensated indigent and charity care, or both in an amount equal to or greater than 4 percent of its adjusted gross revenue;

provided, however, that single specialty ambulatory surgical centers owned by physicians in the practice of ophthalmology shall not be required to comply with this subparagraph; and

Provides annual reports in the same manner and in accordance with Code Section 31-6-70.

Noncompliance with any condition of this paragraph shall result in a monetary penalty in the amount of the difference between the services which the center is required to provide and the amount actually provided and may be subject to revocation of its exemption status by the department for repeated failure to pay any fines or moneys due to the department or for repeated failure to produce data as required by Code Section 31-6-70 after notice to the exemption holder and a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The dollar amount specified in this paragraph shall be adjusted annually by an amount calculated by multiplying such dollar amount (as adjusted for the preceding year) by the annual percentage of change in the composite index of construction material prices, or its successor or appropriate replacement index, if any, published by the United States Department of Commerce for the preceding calendar year, commencing on July 1, 2009, and on each anniversary thereafter of publication of the index. The department shall immediately institute rule-making procedures to adopt such adjusted dollar amounts. In calculating the dollar amounts of a proposed project for purposes of this paragraph, the costs of all items subject to review by this chapter and items not subject to review by this chapter associated with and simultaneously developed or proposed with the project shall be counted, except for the expenditure or commitment of or incurring an obligation for the expenditure of funds to develop certificate of need applications, studies, reports, schematics, preliminary plans and specifications or working drawings, or to acquire sites;

Any joint venture ambulatory surgical center that:

Has capital expenditures associated with the construction, development, or other establishment of the clinical health service which do not exceed $5 million;

Provides care to Medicaid beneficiaries and, if the facility provides medical care and treatment to children, to PeachCare for Kids beneficiaries and provides uncompensated indigent and charity care in an amount equal to or greater than 2 percent of its adjusted gross revenue; or

If the center is not a participant in Medicaid or the PeachCare for Kids Program, provides uncompensated care to Medicaid beneficiaries and, if the facility provides medical care and treatment to children, to PeachCare for Kids beneficiaries, uncompensated indigent and charity care, or both in an amount equal to or greater than 4 percent of its adjusted gross revenue; and

Provides annual reports in the same manner and in accordance with Code Section 31-6-70.

Noncompliance with any condition of this paragraph shall result in a monetary penalty in the amount of the difference between the services which the center is required to provide and the amount actually provided and may be subject to revocation of its exemption status by the department for repeated failure to pay any fines or moneys due to the department or for repeated failure to produce data as required by Code Section 31-6-70 after notice to the exemption holder and a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The dollar amount specified in this paragraph shall be adjusted annually by an amount calculated by multiplying such dollar amount (as adjusted for the preceding year) by the annual percentage of change in the composite index of construction material prices, or its successor or appropriate replacement index, if any, published by the United States Department of Commerce for the preceding calendar year, commencing on July 1, 2009, and on each anniversary thereafter of publication of the index. The department shall immediately institute rule-making procedures to adopt such adjusted dollar amounts. In calculating the dollar amounts of a proposed project for purposes of this paragraph, the costs of all items subject to review by this chapter and items not subject to review by this chapter associated with and simultaneously developed or proposed with the project shall be counted, except for the expenditure or commitment of or incurring an obligation for the expenditure of funds to develop certificate of need applications, studies, reports, schematics, preliminary plans and specifications or working drawings, or to acquire sites;

Expansion of services by an imaging center based on a population needs methodology taking into consideration whether the population residing in the area served by the imaging center has a need for expanded services, as determined by the department in accordance with its rules and regulations, if such imaging center:

Was in existence and operational in this state on January 1, 2008;

Is owned by a hospital or by a physician or a group of physicians comprising at least 80 percent ownership who are currently board certified in radiology;

Provides three or more diagnostic and other imaging services;

Accepts all patients regardless of ability to pay; and

Provides uncompensated indigent and charity care in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of such care provided by the geographically closest general acute care hospital; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to an imaging center in a rural county;

Diagnostic cardiac catheterization in a hospital setting on patients 15 years of age and older;

Therapeutic cardiac catheterization in hospitals selected by the department prior to July 1, 2008, to participate in the Atlantic Cardiovascular Patient Outcomes Research Team (C-PORT) Study and therapeutic cardiac catheterization in hospitals that, as determined by the department on an annual basis, meet the criteria to participate in the C-PORT Study but have not been selected for participation; provided, however, that if the criteria requires a transfer agreement to another hospital, no hospital shall unreasonably deny a transfer agreement to another hospital;

Infirmaries or facilities operated by, on behalf of, or under contract with the Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice for the sole and exclusive purpose of providing health care services in a secure environment to prisoners within a penal institution, penitentiary, prison, detention center, or other secure correctional institution, including correctional institutions operated by private entities in this state which house inmates under the Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;

The relocation of any skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or micro-hospital within the same county, any other health care facility in a rural county within the same county, and any other health care facility in an urban county within a three-mile radius of the existing facility so long as the facility does not propose to offer any new or expanded clinical health services at the new location;

Facilities which are devoted to the provision of treatment and rehabilitative care for periods continuing for 24 hours or longer for persons who have traumatic brain injury, as defined in Code Section 37-3-1;

Capital expenditures for a project otherwise requiring a certificate of need if those expenditures are for a project to remodel, renovate, replace, or any combination thereof, a medical-surgical hospital and:

That hospital:

Has a bed capacity of not more than 50 beds;

Is located in a county in which no other medical-surgical hospital is located;

Has at any time been designated as a disproportionate share hospital by the department; and

Has at least 45 percent of its patient revenues derived from medicare, Medicaid, or any combination thereof, for the immediately preceding three years; and

That project:

Does not result in any of the following:

The offering of any new clinical health services;

Any increase in bed capacity;

Any redistribution of existing beds among existing clinical health services; or

Any increase in capacity of existing clinical health services;

Has at least 80 percent of its capital expenditures financed by the proceeds of a special purpose county sales and use tax imposed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 48; and

Is located within a three-mile radius of and within the same county as the hospital’s existing facility;

The renovation, remodeling, refurbishment, or upgrading of a health care facility, so long as the project does not result in any of the following:

The offering of any new or expanded clinical health services;

Any increase in inpatient bed capacity;

Any redistribution of existing beds among existing clinical health services; or

A capital expenditure exceeding the threshold contained in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-6-40;

Other than for equipment used to provide positron emission tomography (PET) services, the acquisition of diagnostic, therapeutic, or other imaging equipment with a value of $3 million or less, by or on behalf of:

A hospital; or

An individual private physician or single group practice of physicians exclusively for use on patients of such private physician or single group practice of physicians and such private physician or member of such single group practice of physicians is physically present at the practice location where the diagnostic or other imaging equipment is located at least 75 percent of the time that the equipment is in use.

The amount specified in this paragraph shall not include build-out costs, as defined by the department, but shall include all functionally related equipment, software, and any warranty and services contract costs for the first five years. The acquisition of one or more items of functionally related diagnostic or therapeutic equipment shall be considered as one project. The dollar amount specified in this paragraph and in paragraph (10) of this subsection shall be adjusted annually by an amount calculated by multiplying such dollar amounts (as adjusted for the preceding year) by the annual percentage of change in the consumer price index, or its successor or appropriate replacement index, if any, published by the United States Department of Labor for the preceding calendar year, commencing on July 1, 2010; and

A capital expenditure of $10 million or less by a hospital at such hospital’s primary campus for:

The expansion or addition of the following clinical health services: operating rooms, other than dedicated outpatient operating rooms; medical-surgical services; gynecology; procedure rooms; intensive care; pharmaceutical services; pediatrics; cardiac care or other general hospital services; provided, however, that such expenditure does not include the expansion or addition of inpatient beds or the conversion of one type of inpatient bed to another type of inpatient bed; or

The movement of clinical health services from one location on the hospital’s primary campus to another location on such hospital’s primary campus.

By rule, the department shall establish a procedure for expediting or waiving reviews of certain projects the nonreview of which it deems compatible with the purposes of this chapter, in addition to expenditures exempted from review by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31; Ga. L. 1989, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1871, § 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, §§ 22, 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 9, § 2/HB 967; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-24/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 337, § 1/SB 361; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 5/HB 769; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-10/HB 186; Ga. L. 2019, p. 945, § 3/HB 300; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added paragraph (a)(9.2); and inserted “, or micro-hospital” near the middle of paragraph (a)(24).

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “42 U.S.C. Section” for “42 U.S.C. §” in paragraph (a)(5); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(9) for the former provisions, which read: “Expenditures for the acquisition of existing health care facilities by stock or asset purchase, merger, consolidation, or other lawful means unless the facilities are owned or operated by or on behalf of a:

“(A) Political subdivision of this state;

“(B) Combination of such political subdivisions; or

“(C) Hospital authority, as defined in Article 4 of Chapter 7 of this title;”; deleted former paragraph (a)(9.1), which read: “Expenditures for the restructuring of or for the acquisition by stock or asset purchase, merger, consolidation, or other lawful means of an existing health care facility which is owned or operated by or on behalf of any entity described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (9) of this subsection only if such restructuring or acquisition is made by any entity described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (9) of this subsection;”; redesignated former paragraph (a)(9.2) as present paragraph (a)(9.1); inserted “, magnetic resonance imaging, positron emission tomography (PET), and positron emission tomography/computed tomography” near the end of paragraph (a)(10.1); in paragraph (a)(12), inserted “United States” and deleted “of the United States government,” preceding “calculated from the date”; substituted “such equipment” for “said equipment” in the middle of paragraph (a)(13); inserted “administrative office space; conference rooms; education facilities; lobbies; common spaces; clinical staff lounges and sleep areas; waiting rooms; bathrooms; cafeterias; hallways; engineering facilities; mechanical systems; roofs; grounds; signage; family meeting or lounge areas; other nonclinical physical plant renovations or upgrades that do not result in new or expanded clinical health services,” in paragraph (a)(16); inserted “that” near the beginning of the proviso following division (a)(18)(C)(ii) and in the proviso in subparagraph (a)(20)(E); deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(25); substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of division (a)(26)(B)(iii); and added paragraphs (a)(27) through (a)(29). The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, in paragraph (17), substituted “life plan” for “continuing care retirement” throughout the paragraph. The third 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “that” following “provided, however,” in the undesignated language at the end of subparagraph (a)(18)(C) and in subparagraph (a)(20)(E).

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2008, p. 9, § 2/HB 967, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “continuing care retirement” was deleted near the end of paragraph (a)(17).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section by that Act shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

31-6-47.1.
Prior notice and approval of certain activities.

The department shall require prior notice from a new health care facility for approval of any activity which is believed to be exempt pursuant to Code Section 31-6-47 or excluded from the requirements of this chapter under other provisions of this chapter. The department may require prior notice and approval of any activity which is believed to be exempt pursuant to paragraphs (10), (15), (16), (17), (20), (21), (23), (25), (26), (27), (28), and (29) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-6-47. The department shall establish timeframes, forms, and criteria to request a letter of determination that an activity is properly exempt or excluded under this chapter prior to its implementation. The department shall publish notice of all requests for letters of determination regarding exempt activity and opposition to such request. Persons opposing a request for approval of an exempt activity shall be entitled to file an objection with the department and the department shall consider any filed objection when determining whether an activity is exempt. After the department’s decision, an opposing party shall have the right to a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” on an adverse decision of the department and judicial review of a final decision in the same manner and under the same provisions as in Code Section 31-6-44.1. If no objection to a request for determination is filed within 30 days of the department’s receipt of such request for determination, the department shall have 60 days from the date of the department’s receipt of such request to review the request and issue a letter of determination. The department may adopt rules for deciding when it is not practicable to provide a determination in 60 days and may extend the review period upon written notice to the requestor but only for an extended period of no longer than an additional 30 days.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-47.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-11/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “(25), (26), (27), (28), and (29)” for “(25), and (26)” in the second sentence, substituted “department shall establish timeframes, forms, and criteria to request a letter of determination” for “department shall be authorized to establish timeframes, forms, and criteria relating to its certification” in the third sentence, substituted “letters of determination regarding” for “approval of an” in the fourth sentence, and added the last two sentences.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the enactment of this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

31-6-48.
Prior entities abolished; transfer of contractual obligations.

The State Health Planning and Development Agency, the State-wide Health Coordinating Council, and the State Health Planning Review Board existing immediately prior to July 1, 1983, are abolished, and their respective successors on and after July 1, 1983, shall be the Health Planning Agency, the Health Policy Council, and the Health Planning Review Board, as established in this chapter, except that on and after July 1, 1991, the Health Strategies Council shall be the successor to the Health Policy Council, and except that on and after July 1, 1999, the Department of Community Health shall be the successor to the Health Planning Agency, and except that on and after July 1, 2008, the Board of Community Health shall be the successor to the duties of the Health Strategies Council with respect to adoption of the state health plan, and except that on June 30, 2008, the Health Planning Review Board is abolished and the terms of all members on such board on such date shall automatically terminate and the Certificate of Need Appeal Panel shall be the successor to the duties of the Health Planning Review Board on such date. For purposes of any existing contract with the federal government, or federal law referring to such abolished agency, council, or board, the successor department, council, or board established in this chapter or in Chapter 2 of this title shall be deemed to be the abolished agency, council, or board and shall succeed to the abolished agency’s, council’s, or board’s functions. The State Health Planning and Development Commission is abolished.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1880, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 8; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 31; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-25/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

31-6-49.
Transitional provisions.

All matters transferred to the Health Planning Agency by the previously existing provisions of this Code section and that are in effect on June 30, 1999, shall automatically be transferred to the Department of Community Health on July 1, 1999. All matters of the Health Planning Review Board that are pending on June 30, 2008, shall automatically be transferred to the Certificate of Need Appeal Panel established pursuant to Code Section 31-6-44.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

31-6-50.
Application of review procedures to expenditures under Section 1122 of the federal Social Security Act.

The review and appeal considerations and procedures set forth in Code Sections 31-6-42 through 31-6-44, respectively, shall apply to and govern the review of capital expenditures under the Section 1122 program of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, as amended, including, but not limited to, any application for approval under Section 1122 which is under consideration by the Health Planning Agency or on appeal before the Certificate of Need Appeal Panel, successor to the former Health Planning Review Board as of June 30, 2008.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “31-6-42 through 31-6-44” was substituted for “31-6-42, 31-6-43, and 31-6-44”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “Health Planning Agency” was substituted for “department”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

U.S. Code.

Section 1122 of the Social Security Act, as amended, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 1320

a-1.